Utah statutes.
57-1-31.5.   Accounting of costs and fees paid -- Disclosure.
(1)  For purposes of this section, "compensation" means anything of economic
value that is paid, loaned, granted, given, donated, or transferred to a
trustee for or in consideration of:
(a)  services;
(b)  personal or real property; or
(c)  other thing of value.
(2)  If a trustee receives a request from the trustor for a statement as to
the amount required to be paid to reinstate or payoff a loan, the trustee
shall include with that statement:
(a)  a detailed listing of any of the following that the trustor would be
required to pay to reinstate or payoff the loan:
(i)  attorney's fees;
(ii)  trustee fees; or
(iii)  any costs including:
(A)  title fees;
(B)  publication fees; or
(C)  posting fees; and
(b)  subject to Subsection (3), a disclosure of:
(i)  any relationship that the trustee has with a third party that provides
services related to the foreclosure of the loan; and
(ii)  whether the relationship described in Subsection (2)(b)(i) is created
by:
(A)  an ownership interest in the third party; or
(B)  contract or other agreement.
(3)  Subsection (2)(b) does not require a trustee to provide a trustor:
(a)  a copy of any contract or agreement described in Subsection (2)(b);
(b)  specific detail as to the nature of the ownership interest described in
Subsection (2)(b); or
(c)  the amount of compensation the trustee receives related to the
foreclosure of the loan under a relationship described in Subsection (2)(b).
